Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 312 of Title 16, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any person who files a memorandum of agreement (MOA) with a


county clerk in this state shall provide the following with such


filing:


1. A fully executed real estate contract, option agreement, or


other written instrument that satisfies the statute of frauds that


establishes the filer’s valid contractual interest in the real


property affected by the MOA;



Req. No. 3474 Page 1


2. An accurate and full legal description of the real property


affected by the MOA and the purchase price of the property or price


per acre of the property affected by the MOA; and


3. A sworn affidavit affirming the validity of the real estate


contract and that the filing is being made in good faith.


B. A property owner who has a fraudulent MOA filed against his


or her property may request the county clerk to remove the MOA from


the property by filing a sworn affidavit affirming the invalidity of


the real estate contract and that the filing is being made in good


faith.


C. Upon the filing of an affidavit pursuant to subsection B of


this section, the county clerk shall notify the filer of the MOA and


request proof that the MOA is not fraudulent. If proof that the MOA


is not fraudulent is not received by the county clerk within fifteen


(15) days of the day of notification by the county clerk, the county


clerk shall remove the MOA from the property’s record.


D. 1. Any person who knowingly or willfully files a fraudulent


or unsupported MOA shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


misdemeanor and be subject to not more than one (1) year of


imprisonment in the county jail, a fine not to exceed One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00), or both such imprisonment and fine.


2. Property owners may recover actual and punitive damages,


including any lost sale value of the property, attorney fees, and


costs.

Req. No. 3474 Page 2


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3474 BLB 1/15/2026 9:15:09 AM











































Req. No. 3474 Page 3